Illinois, session 104th, SB1961.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-20.12a, 10-20.12b, and 10-21.3a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.12a)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.12a)7    Sec. 10-20.12a. Tuition for non-resident pupils. 8    (a) No district shall charge tuition to non-resident 9pupils To charge non-resident pupils who attend the schools of 10the district tuition in an amount not exceeding 110% of the per 11capita cost of maintaining the schools of the district for the 12preceding school year.13    Such per capita cost shall be computed by dividing the 14total cost of conducting and maintaining the schools of the 15district by the average daily attendance, including tuition 16pupils. Depreciation on the buildings and equipment of the 17schools of the district, and the amount of annual depreciation 18on such buildings and equipment shall be dependent upon the 19useful life of such property.20    The tuition charged shall in no case exceed 110% of the per 21capita cost of conducting and maintaining the schools of the 22district attended, as determined with reference to the most 23recent audit prepared under Section 3-7 which is available at   SB1961- 2 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1the commencement of the current school year. Non-resident 2pupils attending the schools of the district for less than the 3school term shall have their tuition apportioned, however 4pupils who become non-resident during a school term shall not 5be charged tuition for the remainder of the school term in 6which they became non-resident pupils.7    Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a school 8district may waive tuition costs for a non-resident pupil who 9is the child of a district employee if the district adopts a 10policy approving such waiver. For purposes of this paragraph, 11"child" means a district employee's child who is a biological 12child, adopted child, foster child, stepchild, or a child for 13which the employee serves as a legal guardian. 14    (b) Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties involved and 15where the educational services are not otherwise provided for, 16educational services for an Illinois student under the age of 1721 (and not eligible for services pursuant to Article 14 of 18this Code) in any residential program shall be provided by the 19district in which the facility is located and financed as 20follows. The cost of educational services shall be paid by the 21district in which the student resides in an amount equal to the 22cost of providing educational services in the residential 23facility. Payments shall be made by the district of the 24student's residence and shall be made to the district wherein 25the facility is located no less than once per month unless 26otherwise agreed to by the parties.  SB1961- 3 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1    The funding provision of this subsection (b) applies to 2all Illinois students under the age of 21 (and not eligible for 3services pursuant to Article 14 of this Code) receiving 4educational services in residential facilities, irrespective 5of whether the student was placed therein pursuant to this 6Code or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 or by an Illinois public 7agency or a court. The changes to this subsection (b) made by 8this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly apply to all 9placements in effect on July 1, 2007 and all placements 10thereafter. For purposes of this subsection (b), a student's 11district of residence shall be determined in accordance with 12subsection (a) of Section 10-20.12b of this Code. The 13placement of a student in a residential facility shall not 14affect the residency of the student. When a dispute arises 15over the determination of the district of residence under this 16subsection (b), any person or entity, including without 17limitation a school district or residential facility, may make 18a written request for a residency decision to the State 19Superintendent of Education, who, upon review of materials 20submitted and any other items or information he or she may 21request for submission, shall issue his or her decision in 22writing. The decision of the State Superintendent of Education 23is final. 24(Source: P.A. 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24.) 25    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.12b)  SB1961- 4 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1    Sec. 10-20.12b. Residency; payment of tuition; hearing; 2criminal penalty.3    (a) For purposes of this Section:4        (1) The residence of a person who has legal custody of 5    a pupil is deemed to be the residence of the pupil.6        (2) "Legal custody" means one of the following:7            (i) Custody exercised by a natural or adoptive 8        parent with whom the pupil resides.9            (ii) Custody granted by order of a court of 10        competent jurisdiction to a person with whom the pupil 11        resides for reasons other than to have access to the 12        educational programs of the district.13            (iii) Custody exercised under a statutory 14        short-term guardianship, provided that within 60 days 15        of the pupil's enrollment a court order is entered 16        that establishes a permanent guardianship and grants 17        custody to a person with whom the pupil resides for 18        reasons other than to have access to the educational 19        programs of the district.20            (iv) Custody exercised by an adult caretaker 21        relative who is receiving aid under the Illinois 22        Public Aid Code for the pupil who resides with that 23        adult caretaker relative for purposes other than to 24        have access to the educational programs of the 25        district.26            (v) Custody exercised by an adult who demonstrates   SB1961- 5 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1        that, in fact, he or she has assumed and exercises 2        legal responsibility for the pupil and provides the 3        pupil with a regular fixed night-time abode for 4        purposes other than to have access to the educational 5        programs of the district.6    (a-5) If a pupil's change of residence is due to the 7military service obligation of a person who has legal custody 8of the pupil, then, upon the written request of the person 9having legal custody of the pupil, the residence of the pupil 10is deemed for all purposes relating to enrollment (including 11tuition, fees, and costs), for the duration of the custodian's 12military service obligation, to be the same as the residence 13of the pupil immediately before the change of residence caused 14by the military service obligation. A school district is not 15responsible for providing transportation to or from school for 16a pupil whose residence is determined under this subsection 17(a-5). School districts shall facilitate re-enrollment when 18necessary to comply with this subsection (a-5).19    (b) Except as otherwise provided under Section 10-22.5a, 20only resident pupils of a school district may attend the 21schools of the district without payment of the tuition 22required to be charged under Section 10-20.12a. However, (i) a 23child for whom the Guardianship Administrator of the 24Department of Children and Family Services has been appointed 25temporary custodian or guardian of the person of the child and 26who was placed by the Department of Children and Family   SB1961- 6 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1Services with a foster parent or placed in another type of 2child care facility or (ii) a child who has been removed from 3the child's parent or guardian by the Department of Children 4and Family Services as part of a safety plan shall not be 5charged tuition as a nonresident pupil if the foster parent, 6child care facility, relative caregiver, or non-custodial 7parent is located in a school district other than the child's 8former school district and it is determined by the Department 9of Children and Family Services to be in the child's best 10interest to maintain attendance at the child's former school 11district or at a school district the child would have attended 12if the child was not removed from the child's parent or 13guardian by the Department of Children and Family Services.14    (c) (Blank). The provisions of this subsection do not 15apply in school districts having a population of 500,000 or 16more. If a school board in a school district with a population 17of less than 500,000 determines that a pupil who is attending 18school in the district on a tuition free basis is a nonresident 19of the district for whom tuition is required to be charged 20under Section 10-20.12a, the board shall notify the person who 21enrolled the pupil of the amount of the tuition charged under 22Section 10-20.12a that is due to the district for a 23nonresident pupil's attendance in the district's schools. The 24notice shall detail the specific reasons why the board 25believes that the pupil is a nonresident of the district and 26shall be given by certified mail, return receipt requested.   SB1961- 7 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1Within 10 calendar days after receipt of the notice, the 2person who enrolled the pupil may request a hearing to review 3the determination of the school board. The request shall be 4sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the 5district superintendent. Within 10 calendar days after receipt 6of the request, the board shall notify, by certified mail, 7return receipt requested, the person requesting the hearing of 8the time and place of the hearing, which shall be held not less 9than 10 nor more than 20 calendar days after the notice of 10hearing is given. At least 3 calendar days prior to the 11hearing, each party shall disclose to the other party all 12written evidence and testimony that it may submit during the 13hearing and a list of witnesses that it may call to testify 14during the hearing. The hearing notice shall notify the person 15requesting the hearing that any written evidence and testimony 16or witnesses not disclosed to the other party at least 3 17calendar days prior to the hearing are barred at the hearing 18without the consent of the other party. The board or a hearing 19officer designated by the board shall conduct the hearing. The 20board and the person who enrolled the pupil may be represented 21at the hearing by representatives of their choice. At the 22hearing, the person who enrolled the pupil shall have the 23burden of going forward with the evidence concerning the 24pupil's residency. If the hearing is conducted by a hearing 25officer, the hearing officer, within 5 calendar days after the 26conclusion of the hearing, shall send a written report of his   SB1961- 8 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1or her findings by certified mail, return receipt requested, 2to the school board and to the person who enrolled the pupil. 3The person who enrolled the pupil may, within 5 calendar days 4after receiving the findings, file written objections to the 5findings with the school board by sending the objections by 6certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the 7district superintendent. Whether the hearing is conducted by 8the school board or a hearing officer, the school board shall, 9within 30 calendar days after the conclusion of the hearing, 10decide whether or not the pupil is a resident of the district 11and the amount of any tuition required to be charged under 12Section 10-20.12a as a result of the pupil's attendance in the 13schools of the district. The school board shall send a copy of 14its decision within 5 calendar days of its decision to the 15person who enrolled the pupil by certified mail, return 16receipt requested. This decision must inform the person who 17enrolled the pupil that he or she may, within 5 calendar days 18after receipt of the decision of the board, petition the 19regional superintendent of schools to review the decision. The 20decision must also include notification that, at the request 21of the person who enrolled the pupil, the pupil may continue 22attending the schools of the district pending the regional 23superintendent of schools' review of the board's decision but 24that tuition shall continue to be assessed under Section 2510-20.12a of this Code during the review period and become due 26upon a final determination of the regional superintendent of   SB1961- 9 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1schools that the student is a nonresident.2    Within 5 calendar days after receipt of the decision of 3the board pursuant to this subsection (c) of this Section, the 4person who enrolled the pupil may petition the regional 5superintendent of schools who exercises supervision and 6control of the board to review the board's decision. The 7petition must include the basis for the request and be sent by 8certified mail, return receipt requested, to both the regional 9superintendent of schools and the district superintendent.10    Within 5 calendar days after receipt of the petition, the 11board must deliver to the regional superintendent of schools 12the written decision of the board, any written evidence and 13testimony that was submitted by the parties during the 14hearing, a list of all witnesses that testified during the 15hearing, and any existing written minutes or transcript of the 16hearing or verbatim record of the hearing in the form of an 17audio or video recording documenting the hearing. The board 18may also provide the regional superintendent of schools and 19the petitioner with a written response to the petition. The 20regional superintendent of schools' review of the board's 21decision is limited to the documentation submitted to the 22regional superintendent of schools pursuant to this Section.23    Within 10 calendar days after receipt of the documentation 24provided by the school district pursuant to this Section, the 25regional superintendent of schools shall issue a written 26decision as to whether or not there is clear and convincing   SB1961- 10 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1evidence that the pupil is a resident of the district pursuant 2to this Section and eligible to attend the district's schools 3on a tuition-free basis. The decision shall be transmitted to 4the board and the person who enrolled the pupil and shall, with 5specificity, detail the rationale behind the decision.6    (c-5) (Blank). The provisions of this subsection apply 7only in school districts having a population of 500,000 or 8more. If the board of education of a school district with a 9population of 500,000 or more determines that a pupil who is 10attending school in the district on a tuition free basis is a 11nonresident of the district for whom tuition is required to be 12charged under Section 10-20.12a, the board shall notify the 13person who enrolled the pupil of the amount of the tuition 14charged under Section 10-20.12a that is due to the district 15for the nonresident pupil's attendance in the district's 16schools. The notice shall be given by certified mail, return 17receipt requested. Within 10 calendar days after receipt of 18the notice, the person who enrolled the pupil may request a 19hearing to review the determination of the school board. The 20request shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt 21requested, to the district superintendent. Within 30 calendar 22days after receipt of the request, the board shall notify, by 23certified mail, return receipt requested, the person 24requesting the hearing of the time and place of the hearing, 25which shall be held not less than 10 calendar nor more than 30 26calendar days after the notice of hearing is given. The board   SB1961- 11 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1or a hearing officer designated by the board shall conduct the 2hearing. The board and the person who enrolled the pupil may 3each be represented at the hearing by a representative of 4their choice. At the hearing, the person who enrolled the 5pupil shall have the burden of going forward with the evidence 6concerning the pupil's residency. If the hearing is conducted 7by a hearing officer, the hearing officer, within 20 calendar 8days after the conclusion of the hearing, shall serve a 9written report of his or her findings by personal service or by 10certified mail, return receipt requested, to the school board 11and to the person who enrolled the pupil. The person who 12enrolled the pupil may, within 10 calendar days after 13receiving the findings, file written objections to the 14findings with the board of education by sending the objections 15by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the 16general superintendent of schools. If the hearing is conducted 17by the board of education, the board shall, within 45 calendar 18days after the conclusion of the hearing, decide whether or 19not the pupil is a resident of the district and the amount of 20any tuition required to be charged under Section 10-20.12a as 21a result of the pupil's attendance in the schools of the 22district. If the hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, 23the board of education shall, within 45 days after the receipt 24of the hearing officer's findings, decide whether or not the 25pupil is a resident of the district and the amount of any 26tuition required to be charged under Section 10-20.12a as a   SB1961- 12 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1result of the pupil's attendance in the schools of the 2district. The board of education shall send, by certified 3mail, return receipt requested, a copy of its decision to the 4person who enrolled the pupil, and the decision of the board 5shall be final.6    (d) (Blank). If a hearing is requested under subsection 7(c) of this Section to review the determination of the school 8board or board of education that a nonresident pupil is 9attending the schools of the district without payment of the 10tuition required to be charged under Section 10-20.12a, the 11pupil may, at the request of the person who enrolled the pupil, 12continue attendance at the schools of the district pending the 13decision of the board or regional superintendent of schools, 14as applicable, and the school district's payments under 15Section 18-8.05 of this Code shall not be adjusted due to 16tuition collection under this Section. However, attendance of 17that pupil in the schools of the district as authorized by this 18subsection (d) shall not relieve any person who enrolled the 19pupil of the obligation to pay the tuition charged for that 20attendance under Section 10-20.12a if the final decision of 21the board or regional superintendent of schools is that the 22pupil is a nonresident of the district. If a pupil is 23determined to be a nonresident of the district for whom 24tuition is required to be charged pursuant to this Section, 25the board shall refuse to permit the pupil to continue 26attending the schools of the district unless the required   SB1961- 13 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1tuition is paid for the pupil.2    (d-5) (Blank). If a hearing is requested under subsection 3(c-5) of this Section to review the determination of the board 4of education that a nonresident pupil is attending the schools 5of the district without payment of the tuition required to be 6charged under Section 10-20.12a of this Code, the pupil may, 7at the request of the person who enrolled the pupil, continue 8attendance at the schools of the district pending a final 9decision of the board following the hearing. However, 10attendance of that pupil in the schools of the district as 11authorized by this subsection (d-5) shall not relieve any 12person who enrolled the pupil of the obligation to pay the 13tuition charged for that attendance under Section 10-20.12a of 14this Code if the final decision of the board is that the pupil 15is a nonresident of the district. If a pupil is determined to 16be a nonresident of the district for whom tuition is required 17to be charged pursuant to this Section, the board shall refuse 18to permit the pupil to continue attending the schools of the 19district unless the required tuition is paid for the pupil.20    (e) (Blank). Except for a pupil referred to in subsection 21(b) of Section 10-22.5a, a pupil referred to in Section 2210-20.12a, or a pupil referred to in subsection (b) of this 23Section, a person who knowingly enrolls or attempts to enroll 24in the schools of a school district on a tuition free basis a 25pupil known by that person to be a nonresident of the district 26shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.  SB1961- 14 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1    (f) (Blank). A person who knowingly or wilfully presents 2to any school district any false information regarding the 3residency of a pupil for the purpose of enabling that pupil to 4attend any school in that district without the payment of a 5nonresident tuition charge shall be guilty of a Class C 6misdemeanor.7    (g) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 8provisions of the Education for Homeless Children Act. Nothing 9in this Section shall be construed to apply to or require the 10payment of tuition by a parent or guardian of a "homeless 11child" (as that term is defined in Section 1-5 of the Education 12for Homeless Children Act) in connection with or as a result of 13the homeless child's continued education or enrollment in a 14school that is chosen in accordance with any of the options 15provided in Section 1-10 of that Act.16(Source: P.A. 103-629, eff. 1-1-25.) 17    (105 ILCS 5/10-21.3a)18    Sec. 10-21.3a. Transfer of students. 19    (a) Each school board shall establish and implement a 20policy governing the transfer of a student from one attendance 21center to another within the school district upon the request 22of the student's parent or guardian. A student may not 23transfer to any of the following attendance centers, except by 24change in residence if the policy authorizes enrollment based 25on residence in an attendance area or unless approved by the   SB1961- 15 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1board on an individual basis: 2        (1) An attendance center that exceeds or as a result 3    of the transfer would exceed its attendance capacity. 4        (2) An attendance center for which the board has 5    established academic criteria for enrollment if the 6    student does not meet the criteria. 7        (3) Any attendance center if the transfer would 8    prevent the school district from meeting its obligations 9    under a State or federal law, court order, or consent 10    decree applicable to the school district. 11    (b) Each school board shall establish and implement a 12policy governing the transfer of non-resident students from 13outside of the school district to schools within the district.14    (b-1) Whenever a parent or guardian wishes to have a 15student attend a school under subsection (a) or (b), the 16parent or guardian shall apply to the district where the 17student wishes to attend. The district shall approve the 18application unless there is no capacity at the requested 19school in the requested grade level. Within 30 days of the 20initial application, the district of choice shall notify the 21parent or guardian of the approval or disapproval of the 22application.23    (b-2) If a student's transfer application under subsection 24(b-3) is disapproved or no action is taken, the parent may 25appeal the disapproval or lack of action to the State Board of 26Education.  SB1961- 16 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1    (b-3) Each school district shall determine for each of its 2schools the maximum capacity of each grade level and post the 3number of vacancies for each grade on its website by the first 4of each month. A school district shall only measure the 5capacity by grade level and shall not measure capacity by 6specialized program. Schools shall accept pupils throughout 7the school year as capacity allows.8    (b-4) Each school district shall report annually to the 9State Board of Education the number of transfer applications, 10acceptances, denials, the reason for each denial, and the 11number of resident students transferring to another school 12under this Section. The State Board of Education shall publish 13the data annually on its website. 14    (b-5) Each school board shall establish and implement a 15policy governing the transfer of students within a school 16district from a persistently dangerous school to another 17public school in that district that is not deemed to be 18persistently dangerous. In order to be considered a 19persistently dangerous school, the school must meet all of the 20following criteria for 2 consecutive years: 21        (1) Have greater than 3% of the students enrolled in 22    the school expelled for violence-related conduct.23        (2) Have one or more students expelled for bringing a 24    firearm to school as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921. 25        (3) (Blank). Have at least 3% of the students enrolled 26    in the school exercise the individual option to transfer   SB1961- 17 -LRB104 09977 LNS 20047 b1    schools pursuant to subsection (c) of this Section. 2    (c) A student may transfer from one public school to 3another public school in that district if the student is a 4victim of a violent crime as defined in Section 3 of the Rights 5of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act. The violent crime must 6have occurred on school grounds during regular school hours or 7during a school-sponsored event.8    (d) A student may not transfer to an attendance center if 9the transfer would prevent the school district from meeting 10its obligations under a State or federal law, court order, or 11consent decree applicable to the school district.12    (e) When enrolling students, a district shall not 13discriminate against any pupil on the basis of the pupil's 14residential address, ability, disability, race, ethnicity, 15sex, or socioeconomic status.16    (d) (Blank). 17(Source: P.A. 100-1046, eff. 8-23-18.)